Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-836
Major procurement; lottery contractor; performance bond.

Each lottery contractor for a major procurement shall, at the time of executing the contract with the director, post a performance bond with the director, using a surety acceptable to the director, in an amount equal to the full amount estimated to be paid annually to the contractor under the contract.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 36;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 55.